North Carolina, session 2025, HB1225.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-602 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-602. Notice of hearing on proposed zoning map amendments.
…
(f) Delegation. – The governing board may, by ordinance, delegate or assign the
authority for the rezoning of property to a designated planning board. The governing board shall
provide a right of appeal and review before the governing board in accordance with rules adopted
by the governing board. Such authority shall be exercised by the designated planning board under
such rules, regulations, and guidelines as may be established by the governing board."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to the City of Winston-Salem.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1225-v-1*